Utah statutes.
17B-2a-105.   Additional duties of a cemetery maintenance district board of
trustees.
In addition to the powers and duties of a board of trustees under Chapter 1,
Part 3, Board of Trustees, each cemetery maintenance district board of
trustees shall beautify, improve, and maintain each cemetery within the
district.
